Hawaii statutes.
§641-17 Interlocutory appeals from circuit
courts, criminal matters. Upon application made within the time provided
by the rules of court, an appeal in a criminal matter may be allowed to a
defendant from the circuit court to the intermediate appellate court, subject
to chapter 602, from a decision denying a motion to dismiss or from other
interlocutory orders, decisions, or judgments, whenever the judge in the
judge's discretion may think the same advisable for a more speedy termination
of the case. The refusal of the judge to allow an interlocutory appeal to the
appellate court shall not be reviewable by any other court. [L 1892, c 57, §74;
am L 1898, c 40, §2; am L 1903, c 32, §18; am L 1905, c 13, §1; RL 1925, §2515;
RL 1935, §3530; RL 1945, §9531; RL 1955, §210-1; HRS §641-31; am L 1972, c 89,
pt of §5; ren HRS §641-17; am L 1979, c 111, §6(6); gen ch 1985; am L 2004, c
202, §71; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Case Notes

This section is source of power to allow interlocutory
appeal. 44 H. 613, 617, 359 P.2d 932.

Trial court shall carefully consider whether an interlocutory
appeal will more speedily determine litigation, and set forth its reasons if it
so concludes. 67 H. 510, 694 P.2d 388.

While trial court's permission generally required before
bringing interlocutory appeal, not necessary where trial court denies pretrial
motion to dismiss an indictment on double jeopardy grounds. 79 H. 461, 903
P.2d 1282 (1995).

Where defendant failed to file notice of interlocutory appeal
within thirty days from the date the order appealed from was entered, as
required by HRAP rule 4(b), defendant's appeal dismissed for lack of appellate
jurisdiction. 88 H. 404, 967 P.2d 236 (1998).

Where the case was a criminal matter filed by plaintiff State
of Hawaii against defendant and the police department (HPD) was not a party to
the case, HPD, as a nonparty, was not authorized to appeal the respondent
judge's order denying HPD's motion to quash defendant's subpoena duces tecum
pursuant to §641-11 if judgment was entered against defendant; HPD was also not
authorized to appeal the order pursuant to the interlocutory appeal statute for
defendants under this section, or the appeal statute for the prosecution,
§641-13; having no remedy by way of appeal, HPD properly sought redress from
the order by mandamus. 122 H. 204, 225 P.3d 646 (2010).

Cited: 77 H. 351, 884 P.2d 729 (1994).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next